Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.215

Injured volunteer—Recovery from third party.

(1) If an injured volunteer seeks damages from a third party, the state board may also seek recovery of actual costs from the responsible third party. A volunteer seeking damages from a third party is required to notify the state board about the legal proceeding.

(2) The state board is responsible for its proportionate share of the costs and attorneys' fees of the legal proceedings.

(3) Any recovery is subject to a lien by the state board for its share under this section.

(4) This section does not restrict or prohibit the state board's right to seek recovery from a third party when a volunteer firefighter is injured.

[ 2005 c 37 s 3.]